Nebraska, session 109, LB534.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
state settlements, which have been settled by the Attorney General in the
district court and which require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$348,654.28 for Miscellaneous Claim Number 2025-00685, against the State
of Nebraska, pay to Nebraska Press Advertising Service, 845 S Street, Lincoln,
NE 68508-1266, out of the General Fund.
$280,932.50 for Line of Duty Claim Number 2025-00607, against the State of
Nebraska, for Ross Bartlett who died in the Line of Duty, pay to Tina Bartlett,
217 South 2nd Street, Ceresco, NE 68017, out of the General Fund.
$134,046.00 for Miscellaneous Claim Number 2025-00486, pay to Follett
Corporation & its Subsidiaries, 3 Westbrook Corporate Center, Westchester, IL
60154, out of the General Fund.
$250,000.00 for Line of Duty Claim Number 2024-00109, against the State of
Nebraska, for Christopher Marcello who died in the Line of Duty, pay to Tamrae
Marcello, in both her individual capacity and her capacity as parent, guardian,
and next friend of V.E.M., M.M., O.M., and V.M.M., 2213 Riverview Drive, Grand
Island, NE 68801, out of the General Fund.
$182,058.97 for Miscellaneous Claim Number 2024-00040, against the State
of Nebraska, pay to Johnson County, PO Box 416, Tecumseh, NE 68450, out of the
General Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 536 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriations contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $1,195,691.75
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $-0-
TOTAL $1,195,691.75
Sec. 2. The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
indemnification claims which have been settled by the State Claims Board and
approved by the district court, which have been settled by the Attorney General
in the district court, or in which a court judgment has been entered and which
require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$395,000.00 for Indemnification Claim Number 8:23-CV-485, pay to the Trust
Account of Dornan, Howard, Breitkreutz, Dahlquist & Klein PC LLO, on behalf of
the Estate of Kevin C. Carter, 1403 Farnam Street, Suite 232, Omaha, NE 68102,
out of the General Fund.
$85,000.00 for Indemnification Claim Number CI 23-1587, pay to the Trust
Account of Keating, O'Gara, Nedved & Peter, PC, LLO, on behalf of Amy
Eidenmiller, 200 South 21st Street, Suite 400, Lincoln, NE 68510, out of the
General Fund.
$162,500.00 for Indemnification Claim Number 7:22-CV-5002, pay to the
Trust Account of Ramos Law, on behalf of Rachel Ritke, 10190 Bannock Street,
Suite 200, Northglenn, CO 80260, out of the General Fund.
$185,000.00 for Indemnification Claim Number CI 22-2662, pay to the Trust
Account of Fiedler Law Office, on behalf of Gerald Krolikowski, 17330 Wright
Street, Suite 102, Omaha, NE 68130, out of the General Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 592 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriations contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $827,500.00
-1-

LB534 LB534
2025 2025
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $-0-
TOTAL $827,500.00
Sec. 3. The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
workers' compensation claims which have been settled by the Attorney General in
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court or in which court judgments have been
entered and which require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$275,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
High & Younes, LLC, on behalf of Matthew Nicholas, 6919 Dodge Street, Omaha, NE
68132, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$175,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Atwood Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Janice Myers, 575 Fallbrook Boulevard,
Suite 206, Lincoln, NE 68521, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving
Fund.
$215,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Atwood Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Jessica Bock, 575 Fallbrook Boulevard,
Suite 206, Lincoln, NE 68521, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving
Fund.
$25,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Dyer Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Reginald Borzekofski, 2611 South 117th
Street, Omaha, NE 68144, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving
Fund.
$70,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Dyer Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Zachary Coulombe, 2611 South 117th Street,
Omaha, NE 68144, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$50,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Handley Law, PC, LLO, on behalf of Jeffrey Pelowski, 1141 H Street, Lincoln, NE
68508, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$150,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Atwood Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Bobby Green Jr., 575 Fallbrook
Boulevard, Suite 206, Lincoln, NE 68521, out of the Workers' Compensation
Claims Revolving Fund.
$50,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Tabor Law, PC LLO, on behalf of Jeanann Duke (formerly known as Jeanann
Jelinek), 11932 Arbor Street, Suite 101, Omaha, NE 68144, out of the Workers'
Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$250,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Law Offices of Jeffrey F. Putnam, P.C., on behalf of Maureen Scanlon, 6790
Grover Street, Suite 100, Omaha, NE 68106, out of the Workers' Compensation
Claims Revolving Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 593 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriations contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $-0-
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $1,260,000.00
TOTAL $1,260,000.00
Sec. 4. The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
tort claims which have been settled by the State Claims Board and approved by
the district court, which have been settled by the Attorney General in the
district court, or in which a court judgment has been entered and which require
the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$10,894.24 for Claim Number 2025-00553, against the State of Nebraska, pay
to Progressive Universal Insurance Company, PO Box 94639, Cleveland, OH 44101,
out of the State Insurance Fund.
$26,500.00 for Claim Number 2024-00213, against the State of Nebraska, pay
to the Trust Account of Berry Law Firm, 6940 O Street, Suite 400, Lincoln, NE
68510, out of the State Insurance Fund.
$49,826.83 for Claim Number 2023-22836, against the State of Nebraska, pay
to the Trust Account of Ekeh Law Office, L.L.C., 1412 Harney Street, Omaha, NE
68102, out of the State Insurance Fund.
$16,250.00 for Claim Number 2023-22634, against the State of Nebraska, pay
to the Trust Account of Hauptman, O'Brien, Wolf & Lathrop, PC, 1005 South 107th
Avenue, Suite 200, Omaha, NE 68114, out of the State Insurance Fund.
$17,983.05 for Claim Number 2023-22442, against the State of Nebraska, pay
to Traveler's Insurance Company, PO Box 660307, Dallas, TX 75266-0307, out of
the State Insurance Fund.
$950,000.00 for Claim Number 2023-22854, against the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB534 LB534
2025 2025
pay to the Trust Account of Rembolt Ludtke, LLP, 3 Landmark Centre, 1128
Lincoln Mall, Suite 300, Lincoln, NE 68508, out of the State Insurance Fund.
$375,000.00 for Claim Number 2021-21220, against the State of Nebraska,
pay to the Trust Account of Friedman Law Offices, PC, LLO, 3800 Normal
Boulevard, Suite 200, PO Box 82009, Lincoln, NE 68501, out of the State
Insurance Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 594 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriations contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $-0-
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $1,446,454.12
TOTAL $1,446,454.12
Sec. 5. The Director of Administrative Services is hereby authorized and
directed to draw his or her warrants upon the funds in the state treasury
enumerated in this act, in favor of the several beneficiaries named in this act
for the amount set opposite their respective names, upon the presentation of
proper vouchers therefor. The several amounts appropriated in this act shall be
in full payment of any and all claims, rights, causes of action, damages, and
demands of every character and kind owing by or against the State of Nebraska,
its officers, agents, and employees, and their successors and assigns with
respect to each of the beneficiaries respectively in whose favor the
appropriations are made. The director shall not deliver any warrant for any
items appropriated in this act until a receipt and release in full, releasing
the State of Nebraska, its officers, employees, and agents, and their
successors and assigns, has been filed by each of the beneficiaries
respectively. Upon presentation of the warrants, the State Treasurer is hereby
directed to pay the same out of money in the General Fund or out of money in
other funds indicated in this act not otherwise appropriated.
Sec. 6. The following requests were filed by state agencies seeking
permission to write off certain accounts. The State Claims Board reviewed and
approved the following requests:
$14,983.58 for Request Number 2025-00572, made by the Department of
Veterans' Affairs.
$14,296.88 for Request Number 2025-00587, made by the Department of Motor
Vehicles.
$120,741.50 for Request Number 2025-00590, made by the Department of
Transportation.
$90,339.82 for Request Number 2025-00592, made by the Department of Labor.
$49,591.34 for Request Number 2025-00593, made by the Nebraska Public
Employees Retirement Systems.
$53,256.46 for Request Number 2025-00600, made by the Department of
Environment and Energy.
$1,424,360.66 for Request Number 2025-00606, made by the Department of
Health and Human Services.
Sec. 7. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-3-